New York, session 2025-2026, S10603.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Rockland is hereby authorized to accept 3 from Cong Kehal Square of Roman, an application for exemption from real 4 property taxes pursuant to section 430 of the real property tax law with 5 respect to the 2024 assessment roll, and all of 2023-2024 school taxes 6 for the parcel conveyed to such organization, with such parcel being 7 located at 12 Roman Blvd., in the hamlet of Monsey, town of Ramapo, 8 otherwise known as Rockland county tax map section 89, block 56.08-5, 9 lot 47. If accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if it had 10 been received on or before the taxable status dates established for such 11 rolls. 12 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 13 such exemption if such organization had acquired the subject property 14 and filed an application for exemption by the appropriate taxable status 15 date, the assessor, upon approval by the Rockland county legislature, 16 may grant exemption from all taxation and make appropriate corrections 17 to the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such organiza- 18 tion therefore shall have paid any tax with respect to the subject 19 rolls, the governing body or tax department may, in its sole discretion, 20 provide for the refund of those taxes paid and cancel any taxes, fines, 21 penalties, interest or tax liens remaining unpaid. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16031-01-6